Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1615
Plan sponsor; use of self-funding; exemption from other laws.

(1) A plan sponsor shall not be considered an insurer under the laws of this state. The use of any self-funding by a plan sponsor shall not constitute transacting the business of insurance and shall not be subject to regulation by the Department of Insurance.

(2) A plan sponsor shall not be a member of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association or the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association. The Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act and the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act shall not be applicable to the self-funded portion of an employee benefit plan.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 15.

Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act, see section 44-2720.

Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act, see section 44-2418.